Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 2. Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

§ 3.2-109.
Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services; appointments; qualifications; terms of office.

The Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services is established as a policy board, within the meaning of §

2.2-2100

, in the executive branch of state government and may adopt regulations in accordance with the provisions of this title. The Board shall consist of (i) one member from each congressional district, at least eight of whom shall be currently practicing farmers, and (ii) two at-large members, one of whom shall be a structural commercial applicator of pesticides and one of whom shall be engaged in the commercial sale or application of agricultural pesticides; all members to be appointed by the Governor for a term of four years and confirmed by the General Assembly. The presidents of the Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University and Virginia State University or their designees shall be ex officio members of the Board with voting privileges. All members of the Board shall be citizens of the Commonwealth. No member of the Board, except the ex officio members, shall be eligible for more than two successive terms; provided that persons appointed to fill vacancies may serve two additional successive terms after the terms of the vacancies they were appointed to fill have expired. All vacancies in the membership of the Board shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired term.

History.

Code 1950, §

3-1

; 1952, c. 175; 1956, c. 37; 1966, c. 702, §

3.1-1

; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 135; 1978, c. 219; 1985, c. 397; 1992, c. 121; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 98, 185; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 319, cl. 1 provides: “That the Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall adopt regulations that determine whether a private animal shelter meets the purpose of finding permanent adoptive homes for animals.”

Acts 2017, c. 395, cl. 3 provides: “That, beginning July 1, 2017, the term of any member appointed to the Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services pursuant to §

3.2-109

of the Code of Virginia that is set to expire on February 28 shall be extended to June 30 of that year.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 98 and 185 are identical, and in the third sentence, inserted “or their designees” and added “with voting privileges.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 31, are identical, and inserted “of Agriculture and Consumer Services” in the first sentence; in the second sentence, inserted the clause (i) designation, and therein substituted “at least eight” for “at least seven,” added clause (ii), inserted “all members to be,” and made a minor stylistic change; and inserted the fourth sentence.

§ 3.2-110.
Officers of the Board; meetings.

The Board shall annually elect a president, vice president, and secretary.

The Board shall meet at least three times a year for the transaction of business. Special meetings may be held at any time upon the call of the president of the Board, the request of the Commissioner, or the written request of a majority of the Board members.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-2, 3-3; 1966, c. 702, §§ 3.1-2, 3.1-3; 1978, c. 219; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to president of Board being member of board of visitors of Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University, see §

23.1-2601

.

§ 3.2-111.
General powers and duties of the Board.

The Board shall be charged with all matters tending to the promotion of the agricultural interests of the Commonwealth. It shall have power to receive, hold in trust, and administer any donation made to it for the advancement of the agricultural interests of the Commonwealth.

The Board shall have power to purchase or lease land, not to exceed 1,000 acres, for the programs of the Department, and shall regulate and prescribe the salaries of such officers and employees of the Department who shall be employed in such programs.

The Board shall also be required to advise the Governor on the state of the agricultural industry and to advise him on promoting the development of the industry; encouraging persons, agencies, organizations, and industries to develop the industry; working closely with all agencies concerned with rural resources development; coordinating efforts toward maximum farm and off-farm employment; examining marketing procedures and new techniques for selling the Commonwealth’s farm products; formulating plans for developing new markets for such products; and such other matters as the Governor may request.

The Board shall not adopt any regulation that prohibits or restricts a person, his immediate family, or his guests from consuming products or commodities grown or processed on his property provided that the products or commodities are not offered for sale to the public.

The Board shall oversee the development of a farmers market system.

To carry out the provisions of Chapter 39 (§

3.2-3900

et seq.).

History.

Code 1950, § 3-4; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-4; 1972, c. 531; 1985, c. 173, § 3.1-4.1; 1994, c. 370; 2001, cc. 17, 398; 2005, c. 882, § 3.1-14.3; 2008, c. 860; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 31, are identical, and in added subsection F.

§ 3.2-112.
Regulations governing the conduct of referenda.

The Board shall adopt regulations governing the ballots to be used in any referendum, the conduct of any referendum, canvassing the results thereof, and declaring the results of any referendum provided for in this title. The Board shall fix the date, hours, and voting places with respect to the holding of any referendum and may provide for voting by mail. No requirement of this section shall be governed by Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act.

History.

1970, cc. 310, 431, §§ 3.1-796.17, 3.1-684.6; 1980, cc. 316, 395, §§ 3.1-796.06, 3.1-1036; 1982, c. 126, § 3.1-684.25; 1983, c. 375; 1991, c. 587, § 3.1-684.45; 1995, c. 691, § 3.1-1068; 1997, c. 873, § 3.1-1084; 2005, cc. 497, 588, 864, 875, §§ 3.1-22.59, 3.1-636.2; 2008, c. 860.

Law Review.

For an article, “Administrative Procedure,” see 31 U. Rich. L. Rev. 907 (1997).